North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE XX PROHIBITION

Section 217.

Repealed by art. amd. 47, approved November 8, 1932 (S.L. 1933, p. 493). The section as originally adopted read:

To be submitted to a separate vote of the people as provided by the schedule and ordinance.

No person, association or corporation shall within this State, manufacture for sale or gift, any intoxicating liquors, and no person, association or corporation shall import any of the same for sale or gift, or keep or sell or offer the same for sale,
or gift, barter or trade as a beverage. The legislative assembly shall by law prescribe regulations for the enforcement of the provisions of this article, and shall thereby provide suitable penalties for the violation thereof.